Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB603.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45.760 is amended to read as follows:
The provisions of any other law notwithstanding:
(1) During any biennium the amount allotted, from all sources, for expenditure on any
project in the state capital construction program for that biennium shall not exceed
the estimated cost of the project during that biennium, as shown in any branch
budget bill enacted by the General Assembly, except as provided in this section and
KRS 45.770 and 45.780.
(2) When the General Assembly disapproves a capital project or item of equipment that
was previously approved, it shall be eliminated as a capital project or major item of
equipment in the Capital Projects Program. General fund moneys appropriated for
that project or item of equipment but not allotted, and general fund moneys allotted
but not expended to the project or equipment account, shall be transferred to the
capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account in the capital
construction fund. Agency or federal funds for a disapproved project or item, that
have been appropriated but unallotted or allotted but unexpended, shall be returned
to the appropriate agency fund. Road fund moneys for a disapproved project or item
that have been appropriated but unallotted or allotted but unexpended, shall be
returned to the Road Fund Surplus Account.
(3) Capital projects and major items of equipment disapproved under subsection (2) of
this section shall be terminated.
(4) During any biennium, the amount allotted from all sources for expenditure for the
purchase of any major item of equipment shall not exceed the estimated cost of the
item as shown in any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly and
authorizing the purchase, except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this
section and in KRS 45.770 and 45.780.
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2026 12:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2045
(5) A major item of equipment to be used for medical, scientific, or research purposes,
excluding computer equipment and aircraft, may be authorized even though it is not
specifically listed in any branch budget bill enacted for the current biennium,
subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for
another purpose shall not be reallotted for expenditure on the item; moneys
utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not require the use
of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs;
(b) Funds are available for the purchase and the method of financing the purchase
will not require an additional appropriation of state funds to acquire the item;
and
(c) The purchasing agency shall, within thirty (30) days after making the
purchase, report the purchase to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee. The report shall include a description of the item, the purpose for
which it will be used, the necessity for the purchase, and the amount expended
for the purchase from each source of funds used.
(6) Moneys from any source may be transferred to the allotment account of any capital
project authorized by the General Assembly under this section, subject to the
following conditions and procedures:
(a) The total amount transferred shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the
amount authorized by the General Assembly unless:
1. The source of funds is private or federal; or
2. An unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or regulatory agency
requires the transfer.
(b) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for
another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the
capital project.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2026 12:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2045
(c) Moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any existing program and shall not
require the use of any current general funds specifically dedicated to existing
programs.
(d) The relevant entity head, or his or her designee, shall submit the capital
project to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at least
fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting. The submission shall
include a written certification to the committee that the transfer, in excess of
fifteen percent (15%) of the amount authorized by the General Assembly, is:
1. Paid for out of private or federal funds; or
2. Required by an unforeseen decision by a federal or state court or
regulatory agency; and
3. Not allotted or reallotted from moneys specifically budgeted and
appropriated by the General Assembly for another purpose; and
4. Not jeopardizing any existing program and not requiring the use of any
current general funds specifically dedicated to existing programs.
(e) If a capital project is financed with road funds, the cost overruns or scope
increases shall be paid out of the highway contingency account established
pursuant to KRS 45.247.
(7) A capital construction project or a major item of equipment may be authorized even
though it is not specifically listed in any branch budget bill, subject to the following
conditions and procedures:
(a) Fifty percent (50%) or more of the actual cost shall be funded by federal or
private funds, and fifty percent (50%) or less of the actual cost shall be funded
by moneys appropriated to the capital construction and equipment purchase
contingency account or, if the purpose of the project or equipment is to reduce
energy costs, the relevant entity head certifies projected energy cost savings
associated with the project or equipment are reasonable and sufficient to
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2026 12:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2045
produce an aggregate simple payback period, as defined by KRS 56.770, of
five (5) years or less;
(b) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for
another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the
project or major item of equipment; moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any
existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds
specifically dedicated to existing programs; and
(c) The relevant entity head, or his or her designee, shall submit the project or
major item of equipment to the committee for review as provided by KRS
45.800.
(8) The capital construction and equipment purchase contingency fund may be used to
advance funds to projects authorized to be financed by bonds, to finance feasibility
studies for projects which may be contemplated for future funding, or to audit the
capital projects program when authorized by the General Assembly.
(9) On or before October 1, each branch of government shall submit to the committee
the following information:
(a) A complete list and summary description of every capital construction project
and major item of equipment not completed as of June 30 of the prior fiscal
year; and
(b) For each project and major item of equipment, as of July 1, of the current
fiscal year:
1. The project phase;
2. The project account number, project name, and any other term employed
to identify the project or major item of equipment;
3. The available balance in the project or major item of equipment account,
and any sums considered available for that project or major item of
equipment;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2026 12:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2045
4. A statement of the transfers of funds to or from the project or major item
of equipment account; and, any account to which transfers from each
project or major item of equipment has been made;
5. The year in which the project or major item of equipment was approved,
with specific reference to the legislation by which the project or item
was approved;
6. Total expenditure on the project or major item of equipment;
7. The current estimated completion cost, including the amount required
for annual inflation; and
8. A statement that additional funds for the completion of the project or
major item of equipment are or are not required; and, if required, why
sufficient funds for completion are not available; and
(c) The balance in the appropriated, but unallotted account; and the balance in
any account, however designated, that contains appropriated, but unallotted
funds for capital construction.
(10) When the General Assembly authorizes a capital construction item in the capital
construction section of a branch budget bill, the entity head charged with executing
the branch budget shall construct the capital construction item according to the
requirements set forth in the branch budget bill, supporting documentation
considered by the General Assembly, and branch budget records. The entity head
shall not deviate from these requirements with regard to:
(a) Purpose or location to the extent that the capital construction item no longer
meets the identified needs; or
(b) Configuration for reasons other than practical accommodation to the
construction site or specific program to be accommodated within that capital
construction item.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2026 12:28 PM Jacketed